Maryland, session 2025, SB0831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 12–1208 of Article – Commercial Law of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be renumbered to be Section(s) 12–1209.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
12–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Borrower” means an individual who makes a loan application for or receives
a reverse mortgage loan.
(f) “Lender” means a person who makes a reverse mortgage loan.
(h) “Reverse mortgage loan” means a nonrecourse loan that:
(1) Is secured by the borrower’s principal dwelling;
(2) Provides the borrower with purchase money proceeds, a lump sum
payment, periodic cash advances, a line of credit, or any combination of those payment
plans based on the equity in or value of the borrower’s principal dwelling; and
(3) Requires no payment of principal or interest until the full loan becomes
due and payable.
12–1208.
(A) (1) A LENDER SHALL ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT FOR A
REVERSE MORTGAGE LOAN TO BE USED FOR THE PAYMENT OF:
(I) PROPERTY TAXES;
(II) INSURANCE PREMIUMS FOR AN INSURANCE PRODUCT
REQUIRED UNDER § 12–1206(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) GROUND RENTS;
(IV) WATER AND SEWER FACILITIES ASSESSMENTS; AND
(V) HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION OR OTHER COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY CHARGES.

SENATE BILL 831 3
(2) AN ESCROW ACCOUNT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–1026 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(II) ALLOW FOR MONTHLY COLLECTION AND DEPOSIT OF
FUNDS.
(B) A LENDER SHALL:
(1) DEDUCT FROM EACH DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS TO THE
BORROWER UNDER THE TERMS OF THE LOAN AND DEPOSIT INTO AN ESCROW
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AN AMOUNT OF
FUNDS THAT IS:
(I) PROPORTIONAL TO THE PLANNED DISTRIBUTION
SCHEDULE OF FUNDS UNDER THE TERMS OF THE LOAN; AND
(II) SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE ESTIMATED COSTS OF THE
ELIGIBLE HOMEOWNER EXPENSES DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS
SECTION;
(2) DELIVER AN ON–TIME PAYMENT OF EACH ELIGIBLE HOMEOWNER
EXPENSE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION FROM THE
APPROPRIATE ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION TO THE COLLECTION ENTITY FOR EACH ELIGIBLE EXPENSE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.